Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 195 Manpower Services

195.010.
Department of economic security created — Commissioner — Executive assistant and directors — Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

195.020.
Functions of cabinet — Transfer of functions of other agencies.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall exercise all functions of the state in relation to:

Administration and supervision of all forms of public assistance including general home relief, outdoor and indoor care for persons in need, old age assistance, aid to dependent children, and aid to individuals who are blind and other individuals with disabilities.

Administration and supervision of services to needy, neglected, and dependent children.

All administrative functions of the nature outlined above, heretofore performed by other agencies of the state, are hereby transferred to and shall hereafter be performed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 164, § 2; 1952, ch. 83, § 2; 1956, ch. 157, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 183; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 108; 1994, ch. 405, § 46, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 271, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 127, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 41, effective June 20, 2005.

195.030.
Bureaus and divisions — Transfers of other agencies to department. [Repealed.]

195.040.
Free public employment offices. [Repealed.]

195.050.
Bureau of Social Services. [Repealed.]

195.060.
Transfer of personnel of former agencies. [Repealed.]

195.070.
Legal counsel. [Repealed.]

195.080.
Purpose of KRS 195.010 to 195.100. [Repealed.]

195.090.
Transfer of appropriations and allocations. [Repealed.]

195.100.
Division of Personnel Security. [Repealed.]

195.105.
Training program authorized — Research assignment — Classification — Compensation — Contract.

The secretary for health and family services in coordination with the Personnel Cabinet is authorized to establish formal training programs within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or within any of the departments, divisions, or sections of the cabinet for the training of necessary personnel for the administration of the programs of the cabinet. When courses of study, applicable to the program processes of the cabinet, are not available through instruction within the cabinet, arrangements may be made for the training of employees in any public or private school or institution having available facilities for that purpose, and this training shall be deemed to be a part of the cabinet’s training program. Training of employees in public or private schools or institutions for this purpose shall be deemed a part of research assignments to be completed during the period of study, these assignments to relate directly to the work assignment of the employee. After consulting with the Personnel Cabinet, position classifications in the research series shall be established for employees on work study assignments, and funds of the cabinet may be used to pay salaries commensurate with the appropriate classification while the employee is receiving such training.

Any employee who is paid a salary while receiving such training shall be required to enter into a contract, prior to receiving the training, that he will complete a specified work assignment, and that unless he continues in the employ of the cabinet for at least a period equivalent to the training period, immediately following the completion of such training, the state will hold a claim against that person for the amount of salary paid during the training period, and he will repay to the cabinet the sum paid to him by the cabinet during the period of his training.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 85, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107; 1998, ch. 154, § 85, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 126, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 42, effective June 20, 2005.

195.107.
Conflict of interest by members of private industry councils — Effect of violation.

No member of any private industry council, established under the Job Training Partnership Act of 1982 (96 Stat. 1322), shall cast a vote on the provision of services by that member (or any organization which that member directly represents) or vote on any matter which would provide direct financial benefit to that member.

Whenever the secretary determines that there is a substantial violation of subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may issue a notice of intent to revoke approval of all or part of the plan affected.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

195.110.
Duties of commissioner in the administration of division of children’s services. [Repealed.]